apertium-ces-ces.ces_han.dix
    <pardef n="BASE__všecek">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eci</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eci</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éma</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eci</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eci</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eci</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éma</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ech</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eci</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ecky</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>échny</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>écky</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éma</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>echny</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ecky</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>echna</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ecka</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>echna</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ecka</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éma</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>echna</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ecka</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ecek</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eho</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emô</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ecek</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emô</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ím</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ecek</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ecek</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eho</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emô</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ecek</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emô</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ím</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ecek</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>echna</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ecké</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ecké</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eckó</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ecké</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eckó</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ecka</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ecky</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eho</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emô</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ecky</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ym</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ém</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ecky</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="vš/ecek__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ecek<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__všecek"/>
    </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="vš/ecek__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ecek<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__všecek"/>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="všecek"><i>vš</i><par n="vš/ecek__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="všecek"><i>vš</i><par n="vš/ecek__det"/></e>
